Missouri, session 2026, SB1089.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 376, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 376.1960, to read as
follows:
376.1960. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Health benefit plan", the same meaning given to
the term in section 376.1350;
(2) "Home blood pressure monitoring device", a mobile
device that can be used to measure blood pressure, and that
is validated for clinical accuracy and device calibration;
(3) "Home blood pressure monitoring device services",
patient education and training services on the setup and use
of a home blood pressure monitoring device, separate self-
measurement blood pressure readings, daily collection and
transmission of data reports by the patient or caregiver to
the health care provider in order to communicate blood
pressure readings, review of the reports by the health care
provider, and creation or modification of treatment plans
based on the reports.

SB 1089 2
2. Health benefit plans delivered, issued for
delivery, continued or renewed in this state on or after
January 1, 2026, and providing for maternity benefits, shall
provide coverage for a home blood pressure monitoring device
and home blood pressure monitoring device services for
pregnant and postpartum women.
✓